test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v2_lukkeet_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - lukkeet - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     lukkeet+V+Inf: lukkeet
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lujen
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: lujet
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lukkee
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: lujema
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: lujetta
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lujethaan
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lujin
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lujit
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: luki
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: lujima
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: lujitta
     lukkeet+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lujethiin
     lukkeet+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: lukenu
     lukkeet+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: lujettu
     lukkeet+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: lukenheet
     lukkeet+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: lukkeeva
     lukkeet+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: lukkeevat
     lukkeet+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: lujettava
     lukkeet+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: lujettavat

     lukkeet+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: lukisin
     lukkeet+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: lukisit
     lukkeet+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: lukis
     lukkeet+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: lukisimma
     lukkeet+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: lukisitta
     lukkeet+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: lujettais
     lukkeet+V+Pass+Cond: lujettais

     lukkeet+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: luje
     lukkeet+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: lukekkaa
     
     lukkeet+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: lukemassa
     lukkeet+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: lukemasta
     lukkeet+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: lukemhaan
     lukkeet+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: lukemalla
     lukkeet+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: lukematta
